Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-1405
Jurors; oath or affirmation; form.

Thereupon the following oath or affirmation shall be administered to the other grand jurors: The same oath which A. B., your foreman, hath now taken before you on his part, you, and each of you, shall well and truly observe and keep on your respective parts.

G.S.1873, c. 58, § 396, p. 814;

R.S.1913, § 9035;

C.S.1922, § 10059;

C.S.1929, § 29-1405;

R.S.1943, § 29-1405.